Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.050

Allowance of necessary expenses.

He or she shall be allowed all necessary expenses in the care, management, and settlement of the estate.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2034; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.050. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 156; RRS s 1526; prior: Code 1881 s 1541; 1854 p 295 s 164.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SPR 98.12W.

Attorney's fee to contestant of erroneous account or report: RCW 11.76.070.

Broker's fee and closing expenses—Sale, mortgage or lease: RCW 11.56.265.

Compensation—Attorney's fee: RCW 11.48.210.

Monument, expense of: RCW 11.76.130.

Order of payment of debts: RCW 11.76.110.

Will contests, costs: RCW 11.24.050.